Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.200

Enforcement of health laws and state or local rules and regulations upon request of local health officer.

Upon the request of a local health officer, the secretary of health is hereby authorized and empowered to take legal action to enforce the public health laws and rules and regulations of the state board of health or local rules and regulations within the jurisdiction served by the local health department, and may institute any civil legal proceeding authorized by the laws of the state of Washington, including a proceeding under Title 7 RCW.

[ 1990 c 133 s 5; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 259; 1979 c 141 s 56; 1967 ex.s. c 102 s 6. Formerly RCW 43.20A.655 and 43.20.180.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1990 c 133: See notes following RCW 36.94.140.

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 102: See note following RCW 43.70.130.